Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 677.
SECTION 2. (1) As  used in this section, “five-needle protocol” means the standardized
five-needle treatment protocol in which five points on the human outer ear are  stimulated
with sterile,  single-use disposable needles, ear seeds or ear beads for the purpose of achieving
temporary relief from the symptoms of substance use disorder,  mental health conditions or
trauma. The five points are the shen men, sympathetic, liver, kidney and lung points.
(2) The Oregon Medical Board may  establish by rule a registry of individuals who are
qualified to provide the five-needle protocol. The board may adopt rules to establish:
(a) Qualifications for registration, including but not limited  to education and training
requirements;
(b) An application and registration fee;
(c) The form and manner of application;
(d) Sanitation and best practice standards;
(e) A schedule of violations and disciplinary actions; and
(f) Any other requirements or standards the board determines necessary.
(3) The board may issue a five-needle protocol registration to an  applicant who meets the
requirements established by the board by rule under this section.
(4) The board shall adopt rules regarding the renewal of a registration  issued under this
section.
(5) The board may, for the purpose of requesting  a state or nationwide criminal records
check under ORS 181A.195, require the fingerprints of an  individual who is applying for or
renewing a registration under this section or  an individual who is under investigation by the
board for a reason related to registration under this section.
(6)(a) Except as provided in paragraph (b)  of this subsection, only an individual registered
under this section may provide the five-needle protocol and shall use only objectively safe
practices and materials, as further described by the board by rule.
(b) An acupuncturist licensed under ORS 677.757 to 677.770 may  provide the five-needle
protocol without registration under this section.
(7) Subject to ORS 677.759, unless an  individual is an acupuncturist licensed under ORS
677.757 to 677.770, the individual may not hold themselves  out as being an acupuncturist or
Enrolled House Bill 2143 (HB 2143-A) Page 1
otherwise indicate that the individual is authorized  to practice acupuncture, as defined in
ORS 677.757.
(8)(a) Subject to paragraph (b) of this subsection, a proceeding for disciplinary  action of
an individual registered under this section must be substantially in accord with the  following
procedure:
(A) An individual, including a  member of the board, may file a complaint to the board
and the board shall verify the complaint; and
(B) A hearing must be given  to the individual accused in the complaint in accordance
with ORS chapter 183 as a contested case.
(b) Paragraph (a)(B) of  this subsection does not apply if the individual accused in the
complaint admits to the facts of a complaint described in paragraph  (a) of this subsection
so long as the  complaint alleges facts that establish the individual is in violation of one or
more grounds for suspension or revocation of  a registration, as determined by the board by
rule.
SECTION 3.  ORS 677.761 is amended to read:
677.761. Nothing in ORS 677.757 to 677.770 is intended to:
(1) Prevent, limit or interfere with an individual licensed or certified by the Oregon Medical
Board from practicing health care other than acupuncture within the scope of the license or certif-
ication of the individual.
(2) Limit  any other licensed or certified health care practitioner from practicing acupressure
or other therapy within the scope of the license or certification of the individual.
(3) Limit the activities  of any person who engages in the business of providing Oriental massage,
exercise and related therapeutic methods or who provides substances listed in  an Oriental
pharmacopoeia, or vitamins or minerals or dietary advice, so long as the activities of  the person are
not otherwise prohibited by law.
(4) Limit the ability of practitioners  from outside Oregon to demonstrate the practice of
acupuncture as part of a recognized and limited duration educational  program, lecture or event
within this state under rules adopted by the board.
(5) Prevent, limit or interfere with  the provision of the five-needle protocol, as defined
in section 2  of this 2025 Act, in compliance with the requirements of section 2 of this 2025
Act.
SECTION 4.
(1) Section 2 of  this 2025 Act and the amendments to ORS 677.761 by section
3 of this 2025 Act become operative on March 1, 2026.
(2) The Oregon Medical Board may take any action before  the operative date specified in
subsection (1) of this section that is necessary  for the board to exercise, on and after the
operative date specified in subsection (1) of this section, all of  the duties, functions and
powers conferred on the  board by section 2 of this 2025 Act and the amendments to ORS
677.761 by section 3 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 5. This 2025 Act  takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Enrolled House Bill 2143 (HB 2143-A) Page 2
Passed by House April 10, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 2, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2143 (HB 2143-A) Page 3